Utah statutes.
63M-1-1212.   Dissolution.

(1)  Upon the dissolution of the Utah fund of funds, the corporation shall be liquidated and dissolved.

(2)  Upon dissolution or privatization of the corporation, any assets owned by the corporation shall be distributed to one or more Utah nonprofit tax exempt organizations to be designated by the Legislature for the purposes listed in Section 63M-1-1202 as provided in Title 63E, Chapter 1, Independent Entities Act.

